Utah statutes.
11-14-205.    Special registration not required -- Official register supplied by clerk.

(1) (a)  Voter registration shall be administered according to the requirements of Title 20A, Chapter 2, Voter Registration.

(b)  The governing body may not require or mandate any special registration of voters for a bond election.

(2)  The county clerk of each county in which a local political subdivision holding the bond election is located shall prepare the official register for the bond election according to the requirements of Section 20A-5-401.

(3)  The official register's failure to identify those voters not residing in the local political subdivision holding the bond election, or any inaccuracy in that identification, is not a ground for invalidating the bond election.

